Washington statutes.
RCW 41.04.055

Public service loan forgiveness program—Part-time academic employees.

For the purpose of determining whether a part-time academic employee at an institution of higher education is considered full time for certifying employment for the public service loan forgiveness program, duties performed in support of, or in addition to, contractually assigned in-class teaching hours must be included. To calculate this, each hour of in-class teaching time must be multiplied by at least 3.35 hours. This section shall not supersede any calculation or adjustment established by a collective bargaining agreement or employer policy for additional work done outside of in-class teaching for any purposes other than certifying employment for the public service loan forgiveness program. An institution of higher education shall not treat any adjusted total hours worked differently from hours worked without an adjustment when determining whether an employee is full time. "Institution of higher education" has the same meaning as "institutions of higher education" in RCW 28B.10.016.

[ 2024 c 2 s 2; 2022 c 248 s 5.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2022 c 248: See notes following RCW 28B.77.009.